apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
<!--
    <pardef n="min__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
-->

    <pardef n="kemm_huma__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kemm_iequm__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="min__prn"> <!-- TODO: Is this an adverb? -->
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tagħha__prn"> <!-- is this a prep+pronoun combo?-->
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li__rel">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="d/an__det" c="this/these">
      <e>       <p><l>an</l> <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l> <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>awn</l> <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!-- is dana (etc.) the same as dan? TODO -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ana</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ina</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>awna</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/ak__det" c="that/those">
      <e>       <p><l>ak</l> <r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ik</l> <r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>awk</l> <r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aka</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ika</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>awka</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l-__det">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>l-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>il-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iċ-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>id-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>in-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ir-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>is-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>it-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ix-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iz-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iż-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ċ-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>n-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>s-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>t-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>x-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>z-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ż-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>l-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

<!-- p.117 -->
<!--
      <e r="LR"><p><l>l'</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>'l</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
-->
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="oħra__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jn</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ebda__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aħħar__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="koll/u__det">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r>u<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aktar__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ħafna__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="diversi__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Numerals --> <!-- TODO: The whole 'numeral' section needs to be revised, see p.117 -->
    <pardef n="w/ieħed__num">
      <e><p><l>ieħed</l><r>ieħed<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aħda</l><r>ieħed<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uħud</l><r>wieħed<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tnejn__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tli/eta__num">
      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eta</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tt</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħam/sa__num">
    <e><p><l>sa</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>est</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="sitt/a__num">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="seb/għa__num">
    <e><p><l>għa</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a'</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>at</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>agħt</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="tmi/en__num">
    <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>enja</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nt</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="dis/at__num">
    <e><p><l>at</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a'</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>għa</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>għt</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għax/ra__num">
    <e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>art</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħdax__num">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>-il</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għoxrin__num">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="li"><i>li</i><par n="li__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="xi" c="what"><i>xi</i><par n="min__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="min" c="who"><i>min</i><par n="min__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dak li" c="what"><i>dak<b/>li</i><par n="min__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="liema" c="which"><i>liema</i><par n="min__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kemm huma" c="how many"><i>kemm<b/>huma</i><par n="kemm_huma__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kemm iequm" c="how much"><i>kemm<b/>iqum</i><par n="kemm_iequm__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="diversi" c="several"><i>diversi</i><par n="diversi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="oħra" c="other"><i>oħra</i><par n="oħra__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ebda" c="no"><i>ebda</i><par n="ebda__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ħafna" c="many"><i>ħafna</i><par n="ħafna__det"/></e>
    <e lm="aktar" c="more"><i>aktar</i><par n="aktar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tant" c="so much"><i>tant</i><par n="aktar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kollu" c="whole"><i>koll</i><par n="koll/u__det"/></e>
    <e lm="iktar" c="more"><i>iktar</i><par n="aktar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="izjed" c="more"><i>izjed</i><par n="aktar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="anqas" c="less"><i>anqas</i><par n="aktar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="aħħar" c="last"><i>aħħar</i><par n="aħħar__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dan" c="this/these"><i>d</i><par n="d/an__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dak" c="that/those"><i>d</i><par n="d/ak__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħna" c="ours"><i>tagħna</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tiegħek" c="yours (sg)"><i>tiegħek</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħkom" c="yours (pl)"><i>tagħkom</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tiegħu" c="his"><i>tiegħu</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħha" c="hers"><i>tagħha</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħhom" c="theirs"><i>tagħhom</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="wieħed" c="one"><i>w</i><par n="w/ieħed__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tnejn" c="two"><i>tnejn</i><par n="tnejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="żewġ" c="two"><i>żewġ</i><par n="tnejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="zewg" r="LR"><p><l>zewg</l><r>żewġ</r></p><par n="tnejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tliet" c="three"><i>tli</i><par n="tli/eta__num"/></e>
    <e lm="erbgħa" c="four"><i>erbgħa</i><par n="tnejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="erba" c="four"><i>erba</i><par n="tnejn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ħamsa" c="five"><i>ħam</i><par n="ħam/sa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sitt" c="six"><i>sitt</i><par n="sitt/a__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sebgħa" c="seven"><i>seb</i><par n="seb/għa__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tmien" c="eight"><i>tmi</i><par n="tmi/en__num"/></e>
    <e lm="disat" c="nine"><i>dis</i><par n="dis/at__num"/></e>
    <e lm="għaxra" c="ten"><i>għax</i><par n="għax/ra__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tnax" c="twelve"><i>tnax</i><par n="ħdax__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tlettax" c="thirteen"><i>tlettax</i><par n="ħdax__num"/></e>
    <e lm="erbatax" c="fourteen"><i>erbatax</i><par n="ħdax__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ħmistax" c="fifteen"><i>ħmistax</i><par n="ħdax__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sbatax" c="seventeen"><i>sbatax</i><par n="ħdax__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dsatax" c="nineteen"><i>dsatax</i><par n="ħdax__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tletin" c="thirty"><i>tletin</i><par n="għoxrin__num"/></e>
    <e lm="erbgħin" c="forty"><i>erbgħin</i><par n="għoxrin__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ħamsin" c="fifty"><i>ħamsin</i><par n="għoxrin__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sittin" c="sixty"><i>sittin</i><par n="għoxrin__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sebgħin" c="seventy"><i>sebgħin</i><par n="għoxrin__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tmenin" c="eighty"><i>tmenin</i><par n="għoxrin__num"/></e>
    <e lm="l"><i/><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="fil" r="LR"><p><l>f</l><r>fi<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="bil" r="LR"><p><l>b</l><r>bi<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dal" r="LR"><p><l>da</l><r>dan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dil" r="LR"><p><l>di</l><r>dan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="xi" c="what" r="LR"><p><l>x'</l><r>xi</r></p><par n="min__prn"/></e>
